incubator/apertium-hi-ur.hi.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<!--
     Generated from Hindi morph analyser at: http://ltrc.iiit.net/~anusaaraka/

     by

     Amba Kulkarni, University of Hyderabad


     Note: There have been a number of errors introduced in the Unicodification 
           process, a fixed version will be provided at some point, but in the 
	   meantime the file apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix is the reference.
 -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>किपीडियाविविहिनदीकिपीडियापरवागतहैक्तजोकोकारदेताहैहिनदीमेंलेखअआइईउऊएओऐऔऋॠऌॡऍऑपािीुूेोैौृॄॢॣॅॉपापिपीपुपूपेपोपैपौपृपॄपॢपॣपॅपॉ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
    <sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
    <sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
    <sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>
    <sdef n="gen:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
    <sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
    <sdef n="case:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>
    <sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
    <sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>
    <sdef n="num:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:any" c="following noun num any"/>
    <sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
    <sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
    <sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>
    <sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>
    <sdef n="per:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
    <sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
    <sdef n="tam:future" c="future"/>
    <sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
    <sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अमीर/__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="case:any"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बालिका/__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बालक/__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="काली/__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अचूक"><i>अचूक</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अग्रयायी"><i>अग्रयायी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="आइंदा"><i>आइंद्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अकार्य"><i>अकार्य</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अखिला"><i>अखिल्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अक्षयी"><i>अक्षयी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अलगाऊ"><i>अलगाऊ</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पबुद्धि"><i>अल्पबुद्धि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पायु"><i>अल्पायु</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमर्दित"><i>अमर्दित</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमेयात्मा"><i>अमेयात्म्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="आमिषभोजी"><i>आमिषभोजी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमोघदृष्टि"><i>अमोघदृष्टि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमृत्यु"><i>अमृत्यु</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमूर्ति"><i>अमूर्ति</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनमना"><i>अनमन्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनर्घ"><i>अनर्घ</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनसुनी"><i>अनसुनी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक्</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुगतार्थ"><i>अनुगतार्थ</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुहारि"><i>अनुहारि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुषंगी"><i>अनुषंगी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अपकृष्ट"><i>अपकृष्ट</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अपारदर्शी"><i>अपारदर्शी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अपति"><i>अपति</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रभु"><i>अप्रभु</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रत्यक्ष"><i>अप्रत्यक्ष</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अरेणु"><i>अरेणु</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्जुनच्छवि"><i>अर्जुनच्छवि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्थार्थी"><i>अर्थार्थी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="असंख्य"><i>असंख्य</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्वारूढ"><i>अश्वारूढ्</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्थायी"><i>अस्थायी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अठारह"><i>अठारह</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्तु"><i>अवस्तु</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अविकारी"><i>अविकारी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="आविष्ट"><i>आविष्ट</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="आत्मवादी"><i>आत्मवादी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अत्यधिक"><i>अत्यधिक</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अधःशिरा"><i>अधःशिर्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="अयोनि"><i>अयोनि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="आयुक्त"><i>आयुक्त</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बडभागी"><i>बडभागी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बढिया"><i>बढिया</i><par n="बालिका/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहरवाला"><i>बाहरवाल्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बाजरू"><i>बाजरू</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बकध्यानी"><i>बकध्यानी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बालक"><i>बालक</i><par n="बालक/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बालिका"><i>बालिका</i><par n="बालिका/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="बदपरहेज"><i>बदपरहेज</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="भयावना"><i>भयावन्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="भेदवादी"><i>भेदवादी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="भौचक्का"><i>भौचक्क्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="भृश"><i>भृश</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मयोनि"><i>ब्रह्मयोनि</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्याहता"><i>ब्याहत्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="छमछम"><i>छमछम्</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="चट्टानी"><i>चट्टानी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="चिकना"><i>चिकन्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="चिंताकुल"><i>चिंताकुल</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="चौंकानेवाला"><i>चौंकानेवाल्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="छुट्टा"><i>छुट्ट्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐश"><i>ऐश</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="गडा"><i>गड्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="घमंडी"><i>घमंडी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="घिनौना"><i>घिनौन्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="गुणाढ्य"><i>गुणाढ्य</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="हराभरा"><i>हराभर्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="हवालाती"><i>हवालाती</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="हैंगिंग"><i>हैंगिंग</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="इतनी"><i>इतनी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="झबरा"><i>झबर्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="जानकार"><i>जानकार</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कच्चा"><i>कच्च्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कई"><i>कई</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="खाकी"><i>खाकी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कलमुहाँ"><i>कलमुहाँ</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कापाल"><i>कापाल</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="खरचीला"><i>खरचील्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कैसी"><i>कैसी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="किरकिरा"><i>किरकिर्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="क्षत"><i>क्षत</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ्</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="लब्धा"><i>लब्ध्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="लक्षबेधी"><i>लक्षबेधी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="लवण"><i>लवण</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="महायशा"><i>महायश्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मंत्रहीन"><i>मंत्रहीन</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मनमाना"><i>मनमान्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मनोहारी"><i>मनोहारी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मिश्रित"><i>मिश्रित</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मितभोजी"><i>मितभोजी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="मिथ्या"><i>मिथ्य्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="नाकारा"><i>नाकार्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="नवरंगी"><i>नवरंगी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="निरुत्साह"><i>निरुत्साह</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="नितांत"><i>नितांत्</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="औंधा"><i>औंध्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँ"><i>फलाँ</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँफलाँ"><i>फलाँफलाँ</i><par n="अनेक्/अ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="पापनाशी"><i>पापनाशी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="परिवर्जित"><i>परिवर्जित</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="पातकी"><i>पातकी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="पाँचवा"><i>पाँचव्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रशंसित"><i>प्रशंसित</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रवक्ता"><i>प्रवक्त्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्यक्षदर्शी"><i>प्रत्यक्षदर्शी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋतधामा"><i>ऋतधाम्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="षटकर्ण"><i>षटकर्ण</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सच्ची"><i>सच्ची</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="समाहर्ता"><i>समाहर्त्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="संजात"><i>संजात</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="संक्रामी"><i>संक्रामी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सप्तजिह्व"><i>सप्तजिह्व</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वेसर्वा"><i>सर्वेसर्व्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वोपकारी"><i>सर्वोपकारी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सीधी"><i>सीधी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="श्मशानिक"><i>श्मशानिक</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="सूखा"><i>सूख्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="उपगामी"><i>उपगामी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="उपलक्ष्य"><i>उपलक्ष्य</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="उठल्लू"><i>उठल्लू</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="वरदानी"><i>वरदानी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="विचारज्ञ"><i>विचारज्ञ</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरछा"><i>तिरछ्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरासी"><i>तिरासी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="दर्दमंद"><i>दर्दमंद</i><par n="अमीर/__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="दोरंगा"><i>दोरंग्</i><par n="काल्/आ__अड्ज्"/></e>
    <e lm="योगाभ्यासी"><i>योगाभ्यासी</i><par n="काली/__अड्ज्"/></e>
